Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
CHAPTER 8 Economic Rehabilitation Services

49-8-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as “The Economic Rehabilitation Act of 1975.”

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 1645, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1436, § 1.

49-8-2.
Purpose of chapter.

It is the purpose of this chapter to provide for the administration, allocation, and distribution of funds from the Community Services Block Grant and other funding sources; to provide for the definition of a community action agency; to continue a flexible and decentralized system of state, regional, and local programs; to provide the support for services and activities designed to promote individual and family self-sufficiency and to provide emergency services; to encourage local and state-wide interagency collaboration and coordination; to assist local communities in the establishment of demonstration programs to meet the unmet needs of their citizens; and to provide the fiscal support needed to assure the continuation of community action agencies as grantees for federal, state, and other moneys.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 1645, § 3; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1436, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1350, § 1.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Hospital care for the indigent, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Human Resources, Public Health, Chapter 290-5-5.

49-8-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Board of directors” means the policy-making board of a community action agency.

“Community action agency” means a public or private nonprofit corporation which was a recipient of community services block grant funds on January 1, 1989, or its successors.

“Director” means the person designated by the commissioner of human services to effect the coordination and fiscal accountability of the community services authorized by this chapter.

“Outreach” means staff capability to locate eligible clients, determine and evaluate needs, furnish information, gather data, make referrals, secure transportation, and assist clients in locating existing resources or assist in developing needed resources where none exist.

“Poverty guideline” means the sliding scale of family incomes revised periodically and published as a poverty index in the Federal Register.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 1645, § 2; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1317, § 6.2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1436, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1350, § 2; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-4/HB 228.

49-8-4.
Administration of chapter.

For purposes of administration, responsibility for the coordination of community services and fiscal accountability shall be determined by the commissioner of human services.

The director is authorized to issue special instructions or rules and regulations as necessary to carry out the intent of this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 1645, § 4; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1436, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-26/HB 228.

49-8-5.
Distribution of funds; local boards of directors; audits; bonding of agency employees.

Moneys appropriated for the purposes of this chapter shall be allocated by contract with community action agencies. Such allocations shall be approved by the director only upon the submission of a proposal prepared by the agency and approved by the board of directors of the community action agency involved.

Moneys appropriated for the purposes of this chapter and distributed by means of contracts with community action agencies shall continue to include the Community Services Block Grant. Not less than 90 percent of the community services block grant funds allocated for the State of Georgia shall be distributed to community action agencies by means of contracts with the community action agencies.

The community services block grant funds shall continue to be distributed to each community action agency utilizing a formula based upon a pro rata share of Georgia’s poverty population contained in each agency’s service area.

No funds may be allocated to any community action agency which does not have a policy guaranteeing nondiscrimination in the delivery of services.

No funds may be allocated to any community action agency which does not have a policy-making board of directors. The membership of such board must be made up of no fewer than one-third democratically selected representatives of the client group and no more than one-third public officials or their designees. The remainder of the board shall be composed of members appointed from the public sector.

The director shall be responsible for ensuring that at least an annual fiscal and programmatic audit be conducted of each community action agency to ensure that contract awarded funds are properly and legally utilized and disbursed in accordance with the intentions of this chapter. All employees of each community action agency who handle funds of the agency shall be bonded by a licensed bonding company.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 1645, § 5; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1317, § 6.21; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1436, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1350, § 3.

Cross references.

Area planning and development commissions generally, §

50-8-30

et seq.

49-8-6.
Authorized and unauthorized activities of local agencies.

Each community action agency shall use funds available to it under this chapter and other sources for the planning, operation, outreach, and evaluation of a variety of community service pilot programs designed to assist the economically disadvantaged and other persons to achieve self-sufficiency. Community action agencies shall maintain a coordinating role in the community.

No community action agency, its board members, its executive officer, or its employees shall be authorized to use funds, facilities, or equipment owned by or available to the agency, including, but not limited to, stationery, postage, duplicating machines, and telephones, in behalf of any candidate for elective office or any political party or in support of any position on a question of public policy which is the subject of a referendum in the area in which such agency is located. No community action agency shall engage in the manufacture, distribution, display, advertising, or mailing of any printed materials in behalf of any candidate for elective office or any political party or in support of any position on a question of public policy which is the subject of a referendum in the area in which such agency is located.

Work plans submitted to the director must be approved in advance by the board of directors described in paragraph (1) of Code Section 49-8-3.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 1645, § 6; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1436, § 1.

49-8-7.
[Repealed] Opportunity to accept or reject proposals; services must meet minimum requirements of department; utilization of existing service delivery systems; compliance with federal legislation.

History.

Ga. L. 1982, p. 1285, § 1; Code 1981, §

49-8-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 1285, § 2; and Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 38; repealed by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1436, § 1, effective July 1, 1990.